
























Edelman Financial Services LLC: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 28, 2017 11:44 AM ET
Capital Markets

Company Overview of Edelman Financial Services LLC



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Edelman Financial Services LLC is a privately owned investment manager. It provides its services to individuals, trusts, estates, charitable organizations, foundations, pensions, retirement, and profit sharing plans, institutions, and small businesses. The firm manages separate client portfolios. It also manages mutual funds and exchange traded funds for its clients. The firm employs a combination of in-house and external research to make its investments. It also provides investment advisory services and financial education services. The firm operates as a subsidiary of The Edelman Financial Center, LLC. Edelman Financial Services LLC was founded in 1986, and is based in Fairfax, Virginia.


4000 Legato Road9th FloorFairfax, VA 22033United StatesFounded in 1986



Phone: 888-752-6742

www.ricedelman.com







Key Executives for Edelman Financial Services LLC




Mr. Ryan Parker


      	Chief Executive Officer
      


Age: 42
        







Mr. Edward Philip Moore CFP


      	President
      


Age: 57
        







Mr. Fredric Mark Edelman


      	Founder and Chairman
      


Age: 58
        







Mr. René Emile Chaze


      	Chief Operating Officer and Chief Financial Officer
      


Age: 48
        







Ms. Christine Adele Cataldo


      	Chief Information Officer
      


Age: 40
        




Compensation as of Fiscal Year 2017. 

Edelman Financial Services LLC Key Developments

Edelman Financial Services LLC Presents at In|Vest 2017, Jul-11-2017 04:00 PM
Jul 8 17
Edelman Financial Services LLC Presents at In|Vest 2017, Jul-11-2017 04:00 PM. Venue: New York Marriott Marquis, 1535 Broadway, New York 10036, New York, United States. Speakers: Ryan Parker, Chief Executive Officer.


Edelman Financial Services Names Ryan Parker as Chief Executive Officer, Effective June 20, 2016
May 24 16
Edelman Financial Services has named Ryan Parker its Chief Executive Officer. Parker will join Ric Edelman, the firm's founder and Executive Chairman, in establishing the firm's strategic direction as it continues to expand its client base across the country. Parker will also lead the daily operations of the firm. A veteran executive with 18 years' experience in the financial services industry, Parker most recently was Managing Director, Investment and Planning Solutions at LPL Financial. In that role, he led the sales, marketing, product management and sponsor relations functions in support of over 14,000 independent advisors and 700 financial institutions. Prior to LPL, Parker worked at Russell Investments, Franklin Templeton Investments and Putnam Investments. He starts at the firm on June 20, 2016.


Edelman Financial Services Names James Mendelsohn as its New Chief Marketing Officer
May 10 16
Edelman Financial Services has named James Mendelsohn as its new Chief Marketing Officer. With 20-plus years of experience, Mendelsohn will oversee the company's marketing initiatives as it continues to expand and grow its client base and its presence in each market it serves. Most recently, he served as CMO of CAN Capital, where he led the company's rebranding, launched its digital acquisition channel and developed new products and segments to fuel its expansion.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 @Visory LLC United States 1 Road Partners LLC United States 11T Partners, LLC United States 123Jump.com, Inc. United States 1509225 Ontario, Inc. United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target



No transactions available in the past 12 months.




Request Profile Update

















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Edelman Financial Services LLC, please visit www.ricedelman.com.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close
































	For Corporate Professionals









































































            Call
        

            (888) PLAN-RIC
        


TALK WITH AN ADVISOR
TRY OUR GPS




















CareersFor Corporate Professionals








            Join the Edelman Financial Team
        





















We're Hiring
Edelman Financial Services has been named to The Washington Post Top Workplaces for 2016, 2015 and 2014, the Washingtonian's Great Places to Work 2015,  and the Pensions & Invesments Best Places for 2014.
Are you ready to find out if we have the perfect job for you? Look to the left column and you can filter our current job listings by Department, Metro Area, or ZIP Code.
Learn more about our culture, corporate philosophy, some of our unusual benefits and life at Edelman.
If you’re not finding what you’re looking for but are still interested in working for Edelman Financial, just email your resume to careers@edelmanfinancial.com. We’ll keep you in mind and let you know when the right fit comes along.


SEND US YOUR RESUME TODAY























Careers



For Corporate Professionals




For Financial Planners




Life at Edelman




Our Type of Employee




Search Job Openings









                    Invest in Your Future with Edelman Financial
                


LEARN ABOUT LIFE AT EDELMAN

EXPLORE THE HISTORY OF OUR FIRM




                    Featured Jobs
                


                Financial Planner: Santa Clara, CA

See the Full Description




                Financial Planner: Century City, CA

See the Full Description




                Financial Planner: Novi, MI

See the Full Description




                Financial Planner: Farmington, CT

See the Full Description







































































	Investment Management Services--We help Investors like you









































































            Call
        

            (888) PLAN-RIC
        


TALK WITH AN ADVISOR
TRY OUR GPS
























            We Educate Ordinary Investors Like You 
        

At Edelman Financial Services our job is to make Wall Street understandable and accessible. We work for people like you, folks who are tired of the deceptive business practices pervasive in the retail mutual fund industry.
We provide you with investment strategy tools, The Edelman Managed Asset Program® (EMAP) & Guide to Portfolio Selection® (GPS), that are simple to use but supply you with sophisticated financial advice. Just answer 7 simple questions and then EMAP suggests an asset allocation model matched to the amount of risk you're willing to take.

FIND OUT MORE ABOUT EMAP







Your Own Personal Portfolio, Our Fiduciary Standard
As a Registered Investment Advisory firm, we serve as your fiduciary, which means we act in your best interests.
When you invest in EMAP®, you’ll get a custom portfolio tailored to your individual financial needs. Instead of commissions, you'll pay just one annual fee* for our advice and services. And since our account minimum is just $5,000, we cater to the average investor, not just the wealthy. 

*Clients pay a wrap fee, which covers brokerage execution costs, without regard to the number of transactions executed during the billing period.  EFS has negotiated fees with TD Ameritrade, Fidelity, and Pershing Advisor Solutions (“PAS”) for clearing and execution services.  Transaction costs imposed by these brokerage firms are covered as part of the wrap fee. The wrap fee does not include certain account and securities-related costs, including the fees embedded in the mutual funds, ETFs or annuities in which wrap fee accounts invest. In addition, the fee does not include debit balances, related margin interest, IRA and retirement plan fees, transfer fees, SEC fees, 12b-1 fees for certain money market funds, wire transfer fees, overnight check fees, account closing fees, paper statement delivery fees, non-standard asset fees, insufficient fund fees, returned check fees, transaction charges for fund level asset allocation model trades, expenses charged by the mutual funds (including management fees, transaction charges incurred for fund-level asset allocation model trades, custody of fund assets and other fund expenses), expenses charged by the variable annuities and exchange-traded funds, or other fees or taxes that are required by law.  EFS may from time to time, at its sole discretion reimburse clients for certain fees or charges which are not due to the client’s error. 
As noted above, we anticipate that transactions placed in your account will be executed through either TD Ameritrade, Fidelity, or PAS, however, in the limited circumstances described below, EFS may choose to execute trades with another broker-dealer if we reasonably believe that another broker-dealer can obtain a more favorable execution under the circumstances.  Specifically, occasionally, (typically less than 5% of the time), EFS will utilize broker-dealers other than TD Ameritrade, Fidelity, or PAS to execute large transactions when we determine it is in our clients' best interest. This occurs when the size of the transaction in any one security is so large that it could cause the price of the security to fluctuate, up or down, resulting in an unfavorable execution price for our clients.  We will typically execute such trades with a broker-dealer other than TD Ameritrade, Fidelity, or PAS if a different broker-dealer has the capability to handle such large transactions and to reduce or eliminate the potential negative price fluctuation.  In these instances, the wrap fee does not include the compensation that is paid to the broker-dealer.  This compensation is embedded into the price of the security which is paid by the client.  These additional costs are in addition to the wrap fee paid by the client.


THE EDELMAN MANAGED ASSET PROGRAM






WE PUT YOUR INTERESTS FIRST:

NO COMMISSIONS
NO TRADING EXPENSES
NO BROKERAGE COSTS












Talk With a Planner
For 30 years we’ve been helping everyday Americans, folks just like you, reach their financial goals. Collectively, our financial planners average more than 16 years of professional experience in all areas of personal finance, including investments, estate planning, insurance, taxes, mortgages and much more.

Talk With Planner








Invest Online
Want the convenience of managing your portfolio online? Edelman Online gives you 24/7 access to the Edelman Managed Asset Program®. Best of all, the advisors of Edelman Financial are available if you ever need help or advice – at no extra cost. Just give us a call at (888) PLAN-RIC.

GET STARTED ONLINE








Get Answers To Your Financial Questions
There is no charge to meet with an Edelman Financial Planner. We are happy to examine your current investments and answer all of your financial questions. We’ve helped tens of thousands of people just like you, now it's your turn.

GET STARTED TODAY













                    The Edelman 401(k) Plan
                

If you’re the owner or senior executive of a small or mid-sized company, you should consider The Edelman 401(k) Plan. It helps companies like yours deliver a truly valuable benefit to your employees and they get access to our employee education services – from seminars and books to one-on-one counseling – to help you attract and retain quality staff.

Edelman 401(k) for Business








                    Institutional Services
                

Your organization, foundation, association or non-profit group has worked hard to raise its funds. Now, you need to prudently and responsibly manage those assets, as a proper steward on behalf of your organization’s mission. Join the other organizations that have let us help perform this vital task.

For Institutions









































































	Financial Seminars developed by Ric Edelman











































































            Call
        

            (888) PLAN-RIC
        


TALK WITH AN ADVISOR
TRY OUR GPS




















Our Personal Finance Seminars — Entertaining as Well as Informative!
Get the knowledge you need to plan your financial future. Join the tens of thousands of people who have attended our seminars! Click the blue box to view the seminars coming to you.



Find a location near you



Select a location
Baltimore
Boca Raton
Boston
Chicago
Columbus
Dallas
Detroit
Hartford
Houston
Los Angeles Area
Miami
New York Metro
Orlando
Philadelphia
Phoenix
Raleigh
Richmond
Salt Lake City
San Diego
San Francisco
St Louis
Tucson
Washington DC


or



Please enter a ZIP code.
Not a valid ZIP code.












                Seminars
            









                                Preparing for Retirement
                            


You may have started saving for retirement at work, but planning for your future involves more — like maximizing your Social Security benefits and creating an estate plan. It’s time to think about retirement planning in a whole new way!
Use promo code SUMMER to save $5 off the registration fee! Limited to the first 100 responses.


                                    Details











                                The Truth About Your Future
                            


Ric Edelman, #1 New York Times bestselling author and founder and executive chairman of Edelman Financial Services, will reveal how new, innovative technologies will alter virtually every aspect of your life—with profound implications for your personal finances.


                                    Details





                Webinars
            









                                The Truth About Retirement Plans and IRAs Webinar
                            


Watch this webinar to learn the 4 investments you should never choose for your retirement plan, what to do with old retirement accounts, and much more.

WATCH THE WEBINAR
|
                                

                                    Details











                                Understanding How Social Security Works … To Make It Work For You 
                            


Learn when you should file, how you can maximize your benefit and much more.

WATCH THE WEBINAR
|
                                

                                    Details











                                11 Great Reasons to Carry a Big, Long Mortgage Webinar
                            


Did you know that a mortgage can be an important tool to help you achieve financial success? This webinar explores the 11 great reasons a big, long mortgage can help you achieve financial security in retirement.

WATCH THE WEBINAR
|
                                

                                    Details











                                Are Your Emotions Causing You to Make Money Mistakes? 
                            


Many fail financially because of how the brain tricks you. This webinar will look at 10 specific biases we have and the 5 ways a financial advisor can help. 

WATCH THE WEBINAR
|
                                

                                    Details











                                Estate Planning: Keeping Your Money in the Family
                            


Are you – or a friend of family member – dealing with inheritance or estate planning issues? This webinar addresses the importance of family dynamics, how to begin thinking about the question "Who gets what?” and much more.

WATCH THE WEBINAR
|
                                

                                    Details









                    Invest With Edelman Financial Services
                


TALK WITH A PLANNER

Find an Office Near You








































































	Financial Planning









































































            Call
        

            (888) PLAN-RIC
        


TALK WITH AN ADVISOR
TRY OUR GPS




























            You Need a Financial Plan, We're Here to Help
        

You visit the doctor to stay healthy. You don't know how to change the oil, so you take your car to the mechanic. Doesn't your financial future deserve the same care from a professional? 
At Edelman Financial, you don't need to know about dollar cost averaging or RMDs. You just need to be an expert in you! Help us learn about your goals in life, and we'll help you learn about how to plan for them.

TALK WITH AN EDELMAN FINANCIAL PLANNER






















                At Edelman Financial We Put the Client First
            
Our mission is to make professional financial advice and investment services accessible to everyone. We believe that by putting our clients first, explaining complex financial topics in easy-to-understand language, and helping those in need, we can achieve that goal.
Edelman Financial is one of the largest independent financial planning firms in the nation, and our founder Ric Edelman has been three times ranked the #1 Independent Financial Advisor in the nation by Barron's. With more than 31,000 clients, we are on our way to achieving our mission.

GET ANSWERS TO YOUR FINANCIAL QUESTIONS



















            More Than 100 Financial Planners, One Philosophy
        
Every single one of our financial advisors receives rigorous training in Ric Edelman's philosophy, which is based on academic research (including that of a Nobel laureate in Economics) and Behavioral Finance. 
All of our planners believe that everyone, rich or not so rich, deserves great financial advice and planning services. No matter which advisor you work with, you can be confident that they'll put YOUR BEST INTERESTS FIRST and that you are getting the best experience we have to offer.

TALK WITH AN EDELMAN FINANCIAL PLANNER











                    Let's Start Planning Your Financial Future Today
                

An Edelman Financial advisor can help you build a plan in just 3 simple steps.


1


                                Talk
                            

                                Actually, we'll listen as you explain your needs, dreams, and fears. Then we'll design a personalized plan that explains how we can help you reach your financial goals.
                            





2


                                Act
                            

                                We work together to implement the plan. Then we keep you updated on where you stand and adapt the plan as life happens.
                            





3


                                Relax
                            

                                We're here for you whenever you need us. Call us at any time, for any reason. Buying a new car? Ask our advice. Been offered a new job? Give us a call. Daughter got engaged? Congrats - we'll help you figure out how to pay for the wedding!  If a dollar sign is involved, we can help. We’re just a call or email away.
                            






GET STARTED TODAY




































































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft













The Truth About Ric Edelman
































fwdybxyrrffxyvcvfcuyefruzsct









Free Site Registration
LOGIN
















Bookstore


Calendar


CE Center


Conferences


Subscribe


FA Magazine Subscription


Newsletters


Change of Address


Renew Subscription


News Feeds




Videos


FA Library


Featured




Webcasts


Upcoming


Archived




Whitepapers


Most Recent


Archived


Market and Economic Outlook















	                    Go
                	                






Username

Password



What is 3 + 1?









Remember me




New User? |
					Forgot Username? |
					Forgot Password?






Email for username



What is 3 + 1?











Email for new password



What is 3 + 1?














Home
	 » 		Financial Advisor
	 » 		FA Magazine
	 » 		The Truth About Ric Edelman



July 28, 2017

Subscribe Free






Current Issue


Past Issues




            SUBSCRIBE TO
            










            CONFERENCE NEWS
        


Conference Videos


Invest In Women 2017


Inside Retirement 2017


Morningstar Conference 2017


TD Ameritrade 2017


Inside ETFs Conference 2017


Schwab IMPACT 2016


Inside Alternatives Conference 2016


Inside ETFs Conference 2016


Smart Beta Conference 2016



            ADVISOR SERVICES
        


Broker-Dealers


Custodians/Fee Only


Social Media


Technology



            ADVICE
        


401(k) Plans


Annuities


Benefits


Business Transitions


Charitable Giving


DOL/Compliance/Fraud


Economy


Education/529


Estate Planning


Health Care


Insurance


Practice Management


Retirement Income


Retirement Planning


Social Security


Tax Planning


Variable Annuities


Women and Planning



            INVESTING
        


Alternative Investments


Analysis


Commodities


ETFs


Fixed Income


Impact Investing


International


Mutual Funds


Real Estate/REITs


Smart Beta


U.S. Equity







            RESEARCH
        


10 Young Advisors To Watch


Market and Economic Outlook


Whitepapersfwdybxyrrffxyvcvfcuyefruzsct


B/D Survey Ranking


RIA Ranking



            MORE SERVICES
        


B/D Profiles 2017


B/D Recruiting Special Section


Fixed-Income Supplement


Liquid Alts Special Section


Technology Special Section


Women In The Profession


B/D Recruitment Center


Industry Partnerships





















                                    « Previous Article
                                 |                                     Next Article »
                            

Print
                    |
                    Reprint
                    |
                    Share




The Truth About Ric Edelman


                                            April 1, 2012
                                                                    •
                                                                    Caren Chesler
                                                            





	At the end of 2008, a man called in to the radio show The Truth About Money to complain to the host that his financial advisor had lost about 24% of his portfolio. He was upset and wondered whether he should fire the advisor. The host, independent financial planner Ric Edelman, told the caller he should be doing jumping jacks if his advisor lost only 24% at a time when the S&P 500 was down 40%. It was a wise response because, as it turns out, the caller's advisor was Edelman himself.

	Edelman, 54, dodged a bullet, but it's an example of the kind of potshots people like to take at him. He's one of those guys people love to disparage, largely because of his amazing success and endless capacity for self-promotion. With a radio show, six books, a column, conferences and nearly half a dozen appearances on Oprah, he's everywhere. His books (The Truth About Money; Ordinary People, Extraordinary Wealth; and his latest, The Lies About Money) and his radio program, "The Ric Edelman Show," which allows people to call in for advice, have made him into a personal finance guru rivaling Suze Orman, offering practical advice on how to navigate the sometimes byzantine world of finance. As one longtime industry observer put it, he was Suze Orman before there was a Suze Orman.

	But even Edelman's detractors have to admit he is one of the most successful financial advisors, ever. He turned the concept of the independent financial advisor on its head, showing that just because you forgo working for a brokerage firm and go out on your own it doesn't mean you'll always be alone. His advisory firm, Edelman Financial Services LLC, employs 502 people in 42 offices in 13 states. With clients in all 50 states, the firm gradually plans to grow its national network.

	EFS, which largely serves mass affluent people with $1 million to $2 million in net worth, manages about $7.3 billion for 16,200 clients. It added more than 2,000 new clients last year and brings in about 200 new clients a month.

Barron's ranked Edelman the No. 1 independent financial advisor in the nation for 2009 and 2010, and he was No. 2 for 2011, edged out by Los Angeles-based Steve Lockshin, who scored 100 while Edelman scored 99.99 (the scores are based on an advisor's assets under management, the revenue the firm produces, its regulatory record, the quality of its practice and the advisor's philanthropic work).

	"Ric Edelman is one of the most successful financial advisors as a businessman," says Charles "Chip" Roame, managing partner at Tiburon Strategic Partners, a consulting firm specializing in the financial services industry.

	Roame attributes it to Edelman's personality, his energy, and his marketing abilities. "Many financial advisors, especially independent advisors, are introverts and customer-service-minded individuals. Ric has a big personality, has energy and is strong at marketing," Roame says.

	Edelman doesn't like being compared to people like Suze Orman. Not only does she serve different clients-hers, he says, are largely in debt while his are wealthy enough to be concerned about college and retirement savings-but she's not a financial advisor.

	"Jean Chatzky and the Dolans. Dave Ramsey and David Bach. The list goes on and on of people who are very well known for their books and radio or TV shows and seminars, but the difference between all of them and me is that I'm the only one who is an actual practicing financial advisor," Edelman says. "There's a lot of advice that sounds good in a book but doesn't work in the real world. And you can only know that by having long-term relationships with clients."

	He's not just an advisor. He rewrote the playbook for independent advisors seeking to create a business with real value. When he sold half his firm in 2005 for more than $100 million to Sanders Morris Harris Group, the Houston-based financial services firm founded by George Ball (onetime boss of both Prudential-Bache and E.F. Hutton)-Edelman showed one could build a firm of independent advisors that would have equity beyond the fees it earned. Up to that point, that model was only associated with broker-dealers and a handful of large RIAs specializing in asset management.


First
«
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
»
Next


To read more stories                    , click here



                        Loading Other Articles...
                    



                        Loading Other Articles...
                    



                            « Previous Article
                         |                             Next Article »
                    












                        53 Comments
                    




                                Login in order to post a comment
                            




Comments








                                        5 months ago
                                    


                                    Cuando hayas accedido a esta aplicación haz clic sobre 'Fotos' y creo una carpeta para agrupar tus instantáneas. A continuación arrastra las imágenes al fichero o añádelas buscándolas en tu ordenador. งานคีย์ข้อมูล
                                





                                            asidhot
                                        
                                        5 months ago
                                    


                                    This is my first time i visit here. I found so many entertaining stuff in your blog, especially its discussion.  hcg shots
                                





                                            saad.butt1989@gmail.com
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    I most likely appreciating each and every bit of it. It is an incredible site and decent impart. I need to much obliged. Great employment! You all do an incredible blog, and have some extraordinary substance. Keep doing awesome. kostumer
                                





                                            saad.butt1989@gmail.com
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    Took me time to understand all of the comments, but I seriously enjoyed the write-up. chads tattoo tactic article
                                





                                            madfariz
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    Celana Hernia
Lintah Oil Asli Papua
Lintah Oil
Lintah Oil Asli
Minyak Lintah Papua
Potenzol Cair
Potenzol
Viagra Usa 100mg
Klg Pils
Alat Pro Extender
Klg Pills
Vakum Penis
Vimax Import Asli Canada
VaginaGetar Goyang
Pengghilang Selulit
Vakum Payudara
Penis Getar Goyang
Grow Up Asli
Obat Peninggi Badan
Selaput Dara Buatan
Selaput Dara Palsu
Perangsang Gel
Suoyingao Perangsang Gel
procomil spray asli
procomil spray
Vibrator Kapsul
Kapsul Penggeli Vagina
Vibrator fairy
Vibrator mic
Hammer
Hammer Asli
Hammer Thor Asli
Thor's Hammer Asli
Vimax Oil Asli
Vimax Oil Canada
Semenax Asli
Semenax
Obat Penyubur Sperma
Obat-perangsang serbuk
perangsangserbuk China
fly PerangsangSerbuk
Boneka FullBody
Boneka FullBody full Silikon
Cream Kuda
Cream Kuda Hitam
Cream Jantan Kuda Hitam
Hammer Asli
Hammer Of ThorAsli
Hammer OfThor
OpiumSpray
OpiuSpray Asli
Selaput Dara Buatan
Selaput Dara Palsu
Selaput Dara Palsu
Selaput Dara
Selaput Buatan
Crystal X
Crystal X Plus
                                





                                            madfariz
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    KONDOM BADAK SILIKON
KONDOM GETAR SILIKON
SEX DROPS
BLACK ANT PERANGSANG WANITA CAIR
VAGINA TABUNG SILIKON
VAGINA TABUNG SILIKON
PERMEN SEX LOVE PERANGSANG WANITA
VAGINA PANTAT
LINTAH PAPUA HITAM
LINTAH ASLI PAPUA
OBAT PEMUTIH GIGI
OPIUM SPRAY PERANGSANG WANITA
PERANGSANG WANITA
PENIS TEKUK SILIKON
PENIS KELABANG
ALAT MASTURBASI
TENSUNG CREAM PEMUTIH WAJAH
KONDOM SAMBUNG PENDEK
KONDOM POLOS BEROTOT
KONDOM WOLFTOOTH
CREAM PENGHILANG SELULIT
PENIS MUTIARA
PENIS NAGA GETAR ELEKTRIK
SELAPUT DARA BUATAN
PENIS DILDO GETAR
KLG OBAT PEMBESAR PENIS
CELANA HERNIA
VIMAX ASLI CANADA
FATLOSS JIMPNESS PELANGSING BADAN
BLUE WIZARD PERANGSANG WANITA
PENIS GETAR SILIKON
VAGINA PINGUL GETAR GOYANG
PROEXTENDER ALAT PEMBESAR PENIS
TATTONOX REMOVER
MAXMAN OBAT KUAT PRIA
VIGRX PLUS USA
RING DURU PENGELI
VMENPLUS OBAT KUAT PRIA
BLACK ANT OBAT KUAT SEX
ARABIAN OIL PEMBESAR PENIS
BLACK ANT SERBUK PERANGSANG WANITA
LIQUID SEX OBAT TIDUR CAIR
BLACK MAMBA OIL OBAT PEMBESAR PENIS
VAGINA CENTER
VIAGRA USA 100MG
PENIS 2 KEPALA
KONDOM SAMBUNG BEROTOT
OBAT PELANGSINGBADAN
EMILAY BREAST CREAM PEMBESAR PAYUDARA
MAXMAN CAPSUL OBAT PEMBESAR PENIS
BONEKA SEX FULL BODY
VAKUM PEMBESAR PENIS
GROW UP SUPER USA
KIANPI PILL
OBAT PENGHILANG JERAWAT
CELANA HERNIA DAN OBAT HERNIA
SENEMAX OBAT PEYUBUR SPERMA DAN PENGENTAL SPERMA
VAGINA GETAR GOYANG SUARA
VAGINA GETAR ELEKTRIK
PENIS MUTIARA GETAR SILIKON
NEO SIZE KL PEMBESAR OBAT PENIS TERBAAIK
STUD 007 OBAT KUAT SEX PRIA OLES
VIBRATOR C-STRING
OBAT PEMERAH BIBIR
V9 OBAT KUAT PRIA
RED CIALIS VIAGRA OBAT KUAT PRIA
KONDOM DURI SILIKON
CIALIS 80MG
PROCOMIL SPRAY OBAT KUAT SEMPROT
BIO HAIR 123 OBAT PENUMBUH RAMBUT
PRETTY LOVE VIBRATOR PENGELI VAGINA
VIBRATOR KAPSUL PENGELI VAGINA
COBRA OIL OBAT PEMBESAR ALAT VITAL
VIMAX OIL OBAT PEMBESAR ALAT VITAL
VIGRX PLUS
CIALIS 20MG
CIALIS 50MG
TENGA CUP
                                





                                            madfariz
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    CELANA HERNIA
SELAPUT DARA BUATAN
VIAGRA USA 100MG
SEMENAX
VIMAX KAPSUL
KLG PILLS
CIALIS 80MG
PROCOMIL SPRAY
TENSUNG PEMUTIH WAJAH
CRYSTAL X
Ciri-ciri Vimax Asli
Ciri-ciri Anabolic 24rx Asli
Obat Anabolic 24rx Asli
puerarin kapsul
Obat Pembesar Payudara
puerarin kapsul Asli


Blue Wizard CairVibrator mic
Hammer
Hammer Asli
Hammer Thor Asli
Thor's Hammer Asli
Vimax Oil Asli
Vimax Oil Canada
Semenax Asli
Semenax
Obat Penyubur Sperma
Obat perangsang serbuk
Ciri-ciri Vimax Asli
Ciri-ciri Anabolic 24rx Asli
Obat Anabolic 
24rx Asli
puerarin kapsul
Obat Pembesar Payudara
puerarin kapsul Asli
Vmenplus Asli
Ciri-
CiriVmenplus Asli
Hammer Obat Pembesar Penis
Blue Wizard Cair
                                





                                            madfariz
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    http://klgpills.net/ciri-ciri-obat-anabolic-rx24-asli/
                                





                                            saad.butt1989@gmail.com
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    I really enjoy simply reading all of your weblogs. Simply wanted to inform you that you have people like me who appreciate your work. Definitely a great post. Hats off to you! The information that you have provided is very helpful. seo dallas
                                





                                            saad.butt1989@gmail.com
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    I am trying to decide on a career move and this has helped me with one aspect. Took me time to read all the comments, I discovered so many interesting things inside your blog especially. Thank you so much!  Argentina Dove Hunting
                                





                                            saad.butt1989@gmail.com
                                        
                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    I can't envision concentrating sufficiently long to research; considerably less compose this sort of article. You've beaten yourself with this material. This is incredible substance. DWI Attorney Fort Worth
                                






                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    Truly, this article is really one of the very best in the history of articles. I am a antique ’Article’ collector and I sometimes read some new articles if I find them interesting.  Make a guy fall in love

                                






                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    The greatest articles I have read…. Hoping you would post more… bokföringsbyrå
                                






                                        6 months ago
                                    


                                    This is an extraordinary post. I like this topic.This site has heaps of advantage.I discovered numerous fascinating things from this site. It helps me in numerous ways.Thanks for posting this once more. assignment help online
                                






                                        7 months ago
                                    


                                    I am trying to decide on a career move and this has helped me with one aspect. Took me time to read all the comments, I discovered so many interesting things inside your blog especially. Thank you so much! average homeowners insurance by zip code
                                






                                        7 months ago
                                    


                                    Having studied this I considered this post was very edifying. I appreciate you have put the nice efforts in this blog.  cheap glasses australia
                                






                                        7 months ago
                                    


                                    Wow, What a Excellent post. I really found this to much informatics.  real reviews about weight lost pills
                                






                                        7 months ago
                                    


                                    I am very enjoying reading your well written articles. it's such as you pay plenty of effort and time on your journal. I actually have bookmarked it and that i am trying forward to reading new articles. McQ Alexander McQueen

                                






                                        7 months ago
                                    


                                    Mixture of of our cutting edge cleaning equipment and also years of experience make us your one-stop shop when considering rug cleaning. get bigger butts
                                





                                            ahmadfadilah
                                        
                                        7 months ago
                                    


                                    oiu jurha
ironsteelcenter.com	ironsteelcenter.com
Jual besi beton Sni Ulir Polos	Jual besi beton Sni Ulir Polos
Jual besi hollow	Jual besi hollow
Jual besi cnp	Jual besi cnp
Jual besi unp	Jual besi unp
Jual wiremesh	Jual wiremesh
Jual besi wf	Jual besi wf
Jual besi h beam	Jual besi h beam
Jual Plat besi	Jual Plat besi
Jual pipa besi baja sch 40 sch 80	Jual pipa besi baja sch 40 sch 80
Jual besi siku	Jual besi siku
Jual Plat kapal besi baja bki krakatau steel	Jual Plat kapal besi baja bki krakatau steel
Jual bondek	Jual bondek
Jual baja ringan	Jual baja ringan
Jual Atap spandek	Jual atap spandek
Jual stainless steel	Jual stainless steel
jasa konstruksi	
jasa konstruksi besi baja	
jasa konstruksi gudang	
jasa konstruksi gedung	
jasa konstruksi	
undangan pernikahan	undangan pernikahan
	
www.gudangbesibaja.com	www.gudangbesibaja.com
Jual besi cnp	Jual besi cnp
Jual besi h beam baja	Jual besi h beam baja
Jual Plat besi plat kapal	Jual Plat besi plat kapal
Jual besi siku	Jual besi siku
Jual besi unp	Jual besi unp
Jual besi wf baja	Jual besi wf baja
Jual besi beton Sni Ulir Polos	Jual besi beton Sni Ulir Polos
Jual besi hollow	Jual besi hollow
Jual pipa besi baja sch 40 sch 80	Jual pipa besi baja sch 40 sch 80
Jual wiremesh	Jual wiremesh
Jual bondek	Jual bondek
Jual besi Wf Baja	Jual besi Wf Baja
jasa konstruksi baja wf	
jasa konstruksi jembatan	
jasa konstruksi bangunan	
jasa konstruksi	
undangan pernikahan	undangan pernikahan

                                






                                        8 months ago
                                    


                                    First You got a great blog .I will be interested in more similar topics. i see you got really very useful topics, i will be always checking your blog thanks. 	Genting Dream Cruise Ship
                                





                                            ahmedraza1001
                                        
                                        8 months ago
                                    


                                    For many people this is the best solution here      see how to do it.	รายได้พิเศษ

                                





                                            johnrichard01
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    It is quite beneficial, although think about the facts when it reaches this target.	locksmiths in pembroke pines fl

                                





                                            johnrichard01
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Cool you write, the information is very good and interesting, I'll give you a link to my site. 	Lovetraction Lines

                                





                                            Yan777
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Cek daftar produk fashion wanita terbaik kami. Kami menjual online tas wanita, sepatu wanita, aksesoris wanita, dan sepatu wanita. Ini adalah produk fashion wanita yang bisa membantu anda mendapatkan penampilan yang menarik jual aksesoris wanita online . Ini adalah blog tutorial SEO yang sesuai untuk anda yang masih pemula, anda bisa mempelajari trik SEO terbaru dan juga cara melakukan blogging untuk membuat website anda populer tips SEO terbaru . 
Apakah anda mempunyai masalah keputihan? Kami menyediakan obat keputihan alami yang aman untuk anda gunakan sebagai solusi untuk mengatasi keputihan anda obat herbal keputihan . Solusi untuk obat keputihan hanya di sini singgah di halaman ini . 
Apakah anda ingin berlibur? Kami mempunyai banyak paket penawaran untuk paket wisata liburan terbaik keluarga anda, hubungi kami untuk mendapatkan paket wisata terbaik dari kami Liburan ke singapura . Lihat penawaran paket wisata dan liburan dari kami mampir di sini . 
Penginapan murah depok adalah penginapan yang bisa anda dapatkan dengan harga murah dan bisa di sewa harian, dapatkan info penginapan murah harian dari kami Penginapan Harian Di Depok . Ini info lengkap penginapan murah di depok lihat isi halaman . 
Jasa sewa atau rental mobil harian untuk kota surabaya dan malang saat ini tersedia di rental mobil harian. Hubungi kami jika anda butuh mobil sewa di surabaya ataupun malang rental mobil surabaya murah . lihat harga rental mobil dan sewanya di surabaya lihat halaman . 
Kami menyediakan resep takoyaki terbaik yang bisa anda gunakan untuk membuat takoyaki sederhana. Baca info lengkapnya Resep takoyaki mudah . Cek resep takoyaki mudah dan sederhana kami lihat detik produk . 
Resep kue nastar isi nenas dan keju bisa anda dapatkan di sini. Ini adalah resep kue nastar terbaik dan anda juga bisa membeli kue nastar dari kami dan menjadikannya oleh-oleh untuk keluarga anda. Resep kue nastar keju kraft  . Baca cara membuat resep kue nastar dan beli kue nastar dari kami lihat contoh . 
Apakah anda sedang belajar membuat website? Ini adalah panduan yang bisa anda pergunakan untuk membuat website dengan mudah. Silahkan gunakan panduan penggunaan website ini. Cara membuat website sendiri . ini dia cara pembuatan website paling mudah lihat detik produk . 
Apakah anda ingin membeli baju kaos muslim untuk keluarga anda atau untuk anak anda? Kami mempunyai kaos muslim anak dengan desain unik dan menarik dengan harga kaos muslim yang murah. kaos anak grosir . Lihat koleksi baju kaos anak muslim kami lihat contoh . 
Jika anda mengalami masalah dengan alat vital anda, maka anda bisa membeli obat pembesar alat vital vimax asli dari canada. Vimax asli original ini sudah terbukti ampuh untuk membahagiakan pasangan suami isteri. obat pembesar kelamin pria . Lihat detil dari produk vimax asli canada info lengkap . 
Apakah anda membutuhkan bio spray msi? Ini adalah spray kecantikan yang bisa mengatasi banyak masalah kulit wajah dan merawatnya. Dapatkan msi bio spray yang asli di sini. manfaat bio spray . Cek manfaat dari penggunaan bio spray msi click here . 
Apakah anda ingin membeli mobil honda di kota bandung? Kami adalah dealer mobil honda terpercaya di kota bandung dengan harga yang bersaing. Kami menyediakan mobil honda di bandung dengan kredit yang ringan kredit honda jazz bandung . Lihat penawaran mobil honda bandung kami cek daftar harga . 
Atau jika anda menginginkan mobil toyota, anda juga bisa menghubungi kami di website toyota bandung. Kami adalah dealer resmi mobil toyota di kota bandung. Dapatkan info lengkap dari website kami kredit Toyota Kijang Innova bandung . Cek alamat dealer mobil toyota bandung kami buka tautan berikut . 
Kami menyediakan jasa paket wisata outbound di kota bandung yang bisa anda pergunakan untuk acara gathering perusahaan. Kami mempunyai banyak tenaga profesional yang akan menjamin keamanan anda dalam melakukan outbound. tempat outbound di bandung . lihat paket outbound di kota bandung yang kami tawarkan info lengkap . 
Atau jika anda ingin menjelajahi kota bandung, kami juga mempunyai jasa tour and travel kota bandung yang bisa membantu anda mendapatkan pengalaman terbaik dari wisata di kota bandung ini. Hubungi kami untuk wisata terbaik di kota bandung paket tour wisata jogja . Lihat juga paket tour wisata dari bandung tour and travel kami click here . 
Saat ini media sosial friendster kembali online, dan untuk anda yang ingin bermain friendster bisa mencoba kembali media sosial lawas ini yang hadir dalam kemasan baru. Social Media Friendster kini aktif kembali . Daftarkan kembali diri anda ke media sosial friendster ini dan lihat fitur terbarunya mampir di sini . 
apakah anda memerlukan crystal x yang asli? Kami adalah distributor resmi PT NASA yang menjual produk crystal X yang berkualitas dan dijamin keasliannya. Jangan mengambil resiko dalam merawat organ kewanitaan anda. Gunakan Crystal X asli cara menjadi distributor crystal x . Cek harga crystal x asli dari distributor resmi NASA baca penawaran kami . 
Kami menyediakan tenda kain atau canopy kain awning yang murah dan berkualitas. Jika anda memerlukan canopy kain yang murah dan berkualitas atau tenda membrane, maka anda bisa menghubungi kami. Silahkan memilih koleksi canopy kain kami di sini canopy membrane . lihat model canopy kain kami yang terbaru di sini buka tautan berikut . 
Apakah anda ingin mencetak sesuatu? Kami adalah percetakan terbaik di jakarta yang bisa membantu anda untuk mencetak apapun, jasa percetakan kalender dan jasa percetakan brosur adalah spesialisasi kami, jika anda memerlukan bantuan percetakan silahkan menghubungi kami percetakan murah jakarta selatan . kami siap mencetak brosur dan kalender dengan harga murah info lengkap . 
Wisata di pulau tidung semakin marak belakangan ini. Jika anda ingin berlibur ke pulau tidung ada baiknya anda menghubungi kami. Kami adalah penyedia paket wisata pulau tidung yang terbaik. Paket wisata pulau tidung kami murah dan profesional paket wisata pulau tidung . Ini dia paket wisata termurah pulau tidung yang terbaik untuk anda click here . 
Jika anda memerlukan dekoder atau receiver HD parabola, maka kami adalah toko online receiver HD parabola yang siap melayani anda. Jika anda memerlukan receiver atau dekoder parabola, maka anda bisa menghubungi kami di website resmi kami jual receiver hd . Cek daftar harga receiver dan dekoder HD parabola terbaik kami kunjungi tautan . 
Jika anda memerlukan grosir hijab untuk jilbab yang syar'i maka anda bisa mendapatkan dengan harga murah. Dapatkan jilbab yang sesuai syar'i. Dapatkan juga baju busana muslim terbaru dan dengan model yang unik. jilbab pashmina murah model terbaru 2016 dijual online . Ini dia aneka harga grosir jilbab sesuai syar'i kami lihat isi tautan . 
Kami adalah percetakan kemasan makanan yang bisa memcetak kemasan untuk makanan dengan harga yang murah. Kami juga mencetak kemasan untuk aneka produk dan juga kalender dan brosur Percetakan kardus roti, kue, brownies, fried chicken murah . cek daftar harga cetak kemasan kami lihat halaman web . 
Jika anda memerlukan rental handy talky anda bisa menyewa HT atau handy talky dari kami. Penyewaan handy talky dengan harga murah ini bisa anda gunakan untuk berbagai acara. sewa handy talky . cek daftar harga sewa dan rental handy talky kami buka tautan . 
Jual blue wizard asli yang adalah obat perangsang wanita yang berkualitas. Sangat baik untuk membantu wanita mendapatkan libido yang melemah akibat kelelahan atau stress. Dapatkan blue wizard asli obat perangsang wanita yang berkualitas hanya dari kami jual blue wizard asli . cek produk kami di sini. Hanya blue wizard asli untuk obat perangsang wanita click here . 
Apakah anda senang menggunakan bra dengan desain branded? Jika anda mencari toko online yang menjual bra branded, maka anda bisa mendapatkannya dari toko online kami di bralicious. Silahkan melihat koleksi bra branded kami di sini jual bra set branded . lihat koleksi bra branded di toko online kami mampir di sini . 
Toko bunga surabaya yang menjual banyak produk karangan bunga di kota surbaya siap melayani anda dalam medapatkan karangan bunga yang berkualitas di surabaya. Kami adalah toko bunga surabaya yang bisa membantu anda dalam setiap kebutuhan bunga anda. jual bunga papan surabaya . cek aneka produk karangan bunga kami baca penawaran kami . 
Apakah anda ingin mengetahui cara cepat untuk hamil? Ada banyak sekali fakto yang mempengaruhi kesburan seorang pria dan wanita. Dapatkan saran cara cepat untuk hamil hanya dari dokter profesional di bidang ini. Silahkan cek info lengkapnya di bawah ini. tips cepat hamil . lihat tips cara cepat hamil hanya di sinijargon147.wikidot.com/blog:218">buka tautan berikut . 
Crystal X adalah produk antiseptik untuk membersihkan organ kewanitaan. Jika anda memerlukan produk crystal x asli, maka anda bisa membelinya dari agen crystal x NASA yang resmi. Silahkan mengunjungi website kami untuk mendapatkan produk crystal x yang asli. OBAT KEPUTIHAN ALAMI CRYSTAL X . dapatkan crystal x asli dari website kami info lengkap . 
Information mount Rinjani Trekking - Mount Rinjani or Gunung Rinjani can be sumbitted from Sembalun or Senaru starting point. The amazing sunrise from the peak of Rinjani as you’ve never seen from other places.Sembalun and Senaru village are two common climbing routes up the mountain, all are challenging and you need to be physically fit and have some serious hiking experience, choose from our Trekking Packages ! mount rinjani trekking packages . you can use our services for a great trekking experience on mount rinjani click here . 
Jika Anda termasuk dalam list pertanyaan di atas, OPulsa lah solusinya untuk Anda: 1. Jual Pulsa, Voucher Game, Token Listrik, Voucher TV, dan PPOB (Bayar Tagihan Listrik, Telkom, Speedy, PDAM, dll) Kami memfasilitasi bagi pengguna internet yang ingin membeli pulsa, voucher game online, Pascabayar atau disebut Point Payment Online Bank (PPOB). Beli pulsa bolt . dapatkan paket jual online dan token listrik prabayar PLN di sini kunjungi tautan . 
Apakah anda ingin menurunkan berat badan? Diet yang sehat adalah solusinya dan herbalife adalah produk yang sudah terkenal di dunia untuk membantu diet menurunkan berat badan anda. Jika anda ingin membeli produk herbalife yang asli, maka anda bisa mendapatkannya di sini dalam produk paket herbalife murah Jual Paket Herbalife Indonesia Murah . dapatkan paket herbalife murah anda hanya di sini click here . 
Minyak kemiri adalah minyak yang terbuat dari kemiri dan sudah lama dikenal manfaatnya untuk menyuburkan rambut. Jika anda ingin membeli minyak kemiri yang asli maka anda bisa membelinya dari kami, kami menjual minyak kemiri asli dengan kualitas yang terjamin Harga Minyak Kemiri . lihat penawaran dan manfaat minyak kemiri dari kami cek daftar harga . 
Apakah anda ingin menyewa apartemen secara harian di kota depok. Kami menyediakan banyak pilihan salah satunya adalah apartemen margonda residence di kota depok. Ini adalah apartemen yang bisa menjamin kepuasan anda. Ada banyak fasilitas di apartemen kota depok di margonda residence. Sewa Apartemen Harian Margonda . Daftar harga apartemen murah di kota depok bisa anda cek di sini buka tautan berikut . 
Apakah anda memerlukan bibit bunga untuk berkebun? Ada banyak pilihan tanaman hias yang bisa anda beli bibitnya secara online saat ini anda bisa membeli bibit bunga dan tanaman hias dengan mudah dan harga murah jika anda membelinya dari website kebunbit dapatkan keperluan berkebun anda di sini tanaman buah . cek penawaran dan jenis bibit yang bisa anda beli untuk berkebun info lengkap . 
Apakah anda memerlukan obat herbal online seperti jamu? Jika anda ingin membeli jamu atau obat herbal yang berkualitas untuk pengobatan tradisional anda bisa membelinya dari kami. Kami adalah toko online yang menjual produk obat herbal yang bermanfaat untuk kesehatan anda. pengobatan alternatif . Dapatkan daftar jamu atau obat herbal anda di sini click here . 
Apakah anda membeli bunga papan? Kami adalah toko bunga surabaya yang menjual bunga papan secara online, jika anda memerlukan bunga papan, maka anda bisa menghubungi kami di sini toko online bunga surabaya. Dapatkan aneka rangkaian bunga anda hanya dari kami adijasa surabaya . kunjungi website toko bunga online surabaya kami. mampir di sini . 
Memperbesar ukuran dari alat kelamin pria menjadi kebutuhan banyak orang saat ini. Jika anda memerlukan obat yang teruji dapat memperbesar alat vital laki-laki anda, maka anda bisa mencoba obat pembesar alat vital KLG asli yang manfaatnya sudah terbukti KLG Pills . Dapatkan produk obat pembesar kelamin pria KLG asli click here . 
Apakah anda memerlukan kerudung jilbab instan murah? Kami menjual grosir dan eceran kerudung jilbab instan murah dengan desain yang cantik. Dapatkan jilbab instan dan kerudung murah yang terbaik hanya dari kami di toko online terpercaya Jual kerudung murah . Lihat koleksi jilbab instan kami di sini cek daftar harga . 
Apakah anda memerlukan obat herbal untuk asam urat; kolesterol dan diabetes? Anda bisa mendapatkan obat herbal berkualitas untuk asam urat dan kolesterol yang alami dari kami. Ini adalah obat herbal yang alami dan murah untuk anda. obat herbal kolesterol . Daftar harga obat herbal kami buka tautan berikut . 
Apakah anda ingin menyewa rental mobil di bali? Ini dia layanan sewa mobil di bali yang terpercaya dan berkualitas. Anda bisa menyewa mobil rental ini untuk berbagai keperluan anda. Silahkan menghubungi kami untuk keperluan sewa mobil di bali pulau dewata rental mobil di bali . lihat daftar harga sewa rental mobil di bali mampir di sini . 
Apakah anda ingin memesan batu bata merah? Kami menjual batu bata merah jumbo dengan kualitas top dan harga murah. Harga jual bata merah kami bisa lebih murah jika anda membeli batu bata dalam jumlah yang besar. Silahkan hubungi kami untuk memesan batu bata Bata Merah . pesan bata merah jumbo terbaik dari batu bata merah top sekarang juga baca penawaran kami . 
Kini ada FIFORLIF : SOLUSI DETOX yang Aman, Sehat Bernutrisi Tinggi & ENAK rasanya! FIFORLIF yaitu Minuman Serat (Fiber) dari buah yang legendaris disebut dalam berbagai media sebagai SUPER FRUIT yaitu GOJI BERRY (WOLF BERRY) & aneka buah & sayuran sehat bernutrisi tinggi, FIFORLIF tidak hanya membuang toxin di saluran cerna tapi juga sekaligus memberi nutrisi yang dibutuhkan tubuh kita dalam aktifitas sehari-hari dengan harga yang sangat terjangkau & sangat disukai masyarakat. Manfaat dari konsumsi Fiforlif . Beli fiforlif dari agen resmi buka tautan berikut . 
Bagi anda yang ingin memutihkan kulit anda harus mencoba cara alami yang bisa membantu anda untuk memutihkan kulit. Saat ini ada banyak sekali cara memutihkan kulit yang bisa berbahaya bagi kesehatan. Jadi anda harus memilih cara memutihkan kulit yang alami. cara memutihkan wajah secara alami . ini dia cara alami memutihkan kulit info lengkap . 
Apakah anda suka bermain game? Sekarang ini anda bisa mendownload game untuk pc gratis full version. Anda bisa mendownload game full version untuk PC secara gratis dari blog kami. Ada banyak sekali daftar game yang tersedia untuk anda download Game Terbaru . download game pc terbaru dari kami click here . 
Gili is a tourist destination that is in demand by domestic and foreign. Gili possess a special attraction, such as beautiful beaches, can enjoy the sunset and sunrise, Gili Trawangan thick with the feel of the party, and tourists who come to Gili many scuba diving activities and snorkling. Gili Gili fast boat is a boat that is ready to take you to Gili, a luxury boat and full amenities international standard. Do not miss your chance to enjoy the holiday in Gili with Gili Gili fast boat. fast boat to gili . check our cheapest price for gili fast boat tickets kunjungi tautan . 
Kami adalah website yang fokus pada bisnis jual rumah di depok. Jika anda ingin membeli rumah di kota depok, maka kami menyediakan banyak penawaran rumah baru. Jual rumah di depok yang kami lakukan sangat profesional. Silahkan mengunjungi website kami. dijual rumah di kota depok . lihat harga rumah di depok lihat detik produk . 
Atau jika anda hanya ingin menyewa apartemen murah di depok, maka anda bisa menyewa apartemen dengan menggunakan jasa kami. Kami menyediakan apartemen di kota depok yang bisa anda sewa dengan sewa harian. Lihat penawaran apartemen depok dari kami Sewa harian apartemen margonda residence . cek harga sewa harian apartemen murah depok di sini lihat contoh . 
Ini dia laporan penelitian tindakan kelas untuk SMP, baik itu untuk mata pelajaran IPA, IPS, matematika, bahasa inggris, dll. Lihat laporan penelitian tindakan kelas yang kami berikan sebagai contoh. Anda bisa meniru laporan penelitian tindakan kelas SMP yang kami sediakan. Download PTK PKn SMP Kelas 7 8 9 Lengkap . ini dia contoh laporan penelitian tindakan kelas atau PTK SMP info lengkap . 
Apakah anda ingin membeli septic tank biotech atau toilet portable atau tangki fiberglass. Kami menyediakan septic tank biotech, toilet portable, dan tangki fiberglass dengan harga murah. Anda bisa memesan produk kami dari website resmi kami Jual Toilet portable . Cek harga toilet portable, septic tank, dan tangki fiberglass di sini click here . 
Jika anda ingin membeli mobil honda dengan layanan purnajual yang baik, maka anda sebaiknya membeli dari dealer resmi mobil honda di Palembang. Maju Mobilindo adalah dealer mobil honda dengan layanan terbaik di kota palembang promo honda palembang . Ini dia dealer resmi mobil honda terbaik. cek daftar harga . 

                                





                                            johnrichard01
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Listed here you'll learn it is important, them offers the link in an helpful webpage:	Make a man fall in Love

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Noch lukrativer sind nur noch die progressiven Jackpots, durch deren Hilfe Online Spielautomaten im Sekundentakt mit neuen Beträgen gefüttert und die über mehrere Novoline-Casinos hinweg gefüllt werden. Der positive Nebeneffekt: Sofern mit dem Maximaleinsatz gespielt wird, finden völlig zufällige Ausschüttungen aus dem Jackpot statt. novoline online spielen
                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    thoughtfully with clients. Advisors who ask some simple questions and learn from experiences like mine may reduce the angst they and their clients may feel when religion becomes a factor in selecting investments, serving customers and creating harmonious financial plans.sg investigatives

                                





                                            johnrichard01
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    I encourage you to read this text it is fun     described ...	poolüberdachung flach

                                





                                            johnrichard01
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Within this webpage, you'll see the page, you need to understand this data.	Social Media Marketing West Palm Beach

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                     videos is compatible with social medias. We use in an immense database of all the songs and music videos that you could ever think of. We are constantly updating our collection of music from YouTube and cataloguing them each and every day. This means that you will have an unlimited music library that you can use to create your own karaok
escort beirut

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                     fact, you can also record yourself singing or dancing in a video. At the click of a button, you can send this video to all your friends and loved ones, as well as professionals in the music industry. Sharing videos is compatible with social medias. We use in an immense database of all the songs and music videos that you could ever think of. We are constantly updating our collection of music from YouTube and cataloguing them each and every day. This means that you will have an unlimited music library that you can use to create your own karaoke video and music tracks at your own pleasure. Get Your Voice today and tap into that hidden talent for amazing results! 
escorts in lebanon

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Your Voice is the Karaoke app for you if you have ever harbored a secret desire to be a music star with your own bevy of fans.  Your  Voice is the app for you if you have ever wished to craft and create successful music on your own. Your Voice will guide you and help you practice to be a better singer and performer and also share your performances with the rest of the world.       It will be fun and quite easy to sing along to your favorite song. In fact, you can also record yourself singing or dancing in a video. At the click of a button, you can send this video to all your friends and loved ones, as well as professionals in the music industry. Sharing videos is compatible with social medias.             We use in an immense database of all the songs and music videos that you could ever think of. We are constantly updating our collection of music from YouTube and cataloguing them each and every day. This means that you will have an unlimited music library that you can use to create your own karaoke video and music tracks at your own pleasure.            Get Your Voice today and tap into that hidden talent for amazing results!	karaoke version

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    We provide Legal Services for the clients of Toronto, Brampton, Richmond Hill, New Market, Markham Ajax, Pickering, Aurora, Barrie, Georgina and Oshawa approximately within 75 kilometres from our main office.	paralegal services

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    We provide Legal Services for the clients of Toronto, Brampton, Richmond Hill, New Market, Markham Ajax, Pickering, Aurora, Barrie, Georgina and Oshawa approximately within 75 kilometres from our main office.	paralegal services

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Blue Paisley Fine Rugs is Toronto’s newest premier provider of luxurious high quality rugs offering the widest selection in size, colour and services. We believe that every fine rug tells a story and manifests a tradition; it is an investment for generations to come and selecting one should be a tailored fulfilling experience. Our family works closely with our clients and suppliers to ensure that every selection leads to satisfaction for decades.	Toronto Rug Cleaning

                                





                                            johnrichard01
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    For true fans of this thread I will address      is a free online!	Stock Trader Salary

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    At Spa Samira Laser Clinic, our number one priority is customer satisfaction. Highly experienced staff, certified aestheticians, and competitive prices are among reasons why our clients choose us. With services ranging from facial peels and waxes, to laser treatments and permanent hair reduction, we strive to exceed your expectations by offering exceptional customer service, employing state-of-the-art technology and using top-of-the-line products. Contact us to schedule an appointment, and one of our aestheticians will be happy to talk to you.	anti aging clinic

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Blue Paisley Fine Rugs is Toronto’s newest premier provider of luxurious high quality rugs offering the widest selection in size, colour and services. We believe that every fine rug tells a story and manifests a tradition; it is an investment for generations to come and selecting one should be a tailored fulfilling experience. Our family works closely with our clients and suppliers to ensure that every selection leads to satisfaction for decades.	Blue Paisley Fine Rugs

                                





                                            rozirose
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    I am always searching online for storys that can accommodate me. There is obviously a multiple to understand about this. I feel you made few salubrious points in Attributes moreover. Detain busy, awesome career!	Obsession Phrases Review

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Samira Laser Clinic in Scarborough should be your only choice for laser hair removal. Our precision equipment carefully removes your hair while keeping your skin soft and glowing. We specialize in laser hair removal, facials and microdermabrasion. We also perform waxing and sell laser hair removal machines!	Samira Laser Clinic

                                





                                            rozirose
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    I definitely enjoying every little bit of it and I have you bookmarked to check out new stuff you post. lanche

                                





                                            rozirose
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    You might comment on the order system of the blog. You should chat it's splendid. Your blog audit would swell up your visitors. I was very pleased to find this site.I wanted to thank you for this great read!!  los angeles wedding videographer

                                





                                            rozirose
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    It has fully emerged to crown Singapore's southern shores and undoubtedly placed her on the global map of residential landmarks. I still scored the more points than I ever have in a season for GS. I think you would be hard pressed to find somebody with the same consistency I have had over the years so I am happy with that. devenir

                                





                                            micasingh
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Hi there, I discovered your blog per Google bit searching for such kinda educational advise moreover your inform beholds very remarkable for me.
air conditioning repair Woodland Hills
                                





                                            micasingh
                                        
                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    It is extremely excellent, yet go through the details as of this deal with.
Best Diet Pills In 2016 That Work Fast
                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Damara and Mbaiki. Replication is through, first a general introduction of the project concept to key local collaborators and then establishment of a local antenna to broadcast the radio show locally. lebanon escorts
                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    've fixed out through this information is a critical circumstance, as well as the kind which could include badly influenced my complete career if I got not learned your world wide 
[url=http://www.lebanonescortgirls.com]escorts in lebanon[/url]
                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    Something that is very impressive for the reader in this site, it's no wonder that many visitors are on appreciation. 
 egészségügy

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    clothes. In a hurry to pack for their trip, she looked once more for and could not find a favorite bra – not even in the pile of dirty/clean clothes. It had been missing for over a week.Unlock iPhone
                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    All of these features surely have hugely heightened our favorite consistency regarding this type of innovation happening precisely why gets hotter fails we have been an actual left at a true soup. Ashy Bines scam?

                                






                                        1 year ago
                                    


                                    We greatly appreciate your work, hopefully in the future you could be displaying a paper of higher quality.  [url=http://agariohack.info]agario hack[/url]

                                





                                            krag
                                        
                                        5 years ago
                                    


                                    My advisor got me and his clients out of the market and into gold in 2007. Not only did we not lose 24% we gained. Personally I've been investing in APPL since Jobs returned, every couple years I sell a few stops and replace my laptop with a new one.
                                




















Quick Poll
Who would you like to see President Trump pick as chair of the Federal Reserve?







						Gary Cohn
					




						Janet Yellen
					




						Neither of the above.
					




						View Results
					fwdybxyrrffxyvcvfcuyefruzsct










































Home


Login


About Us


Media Kit


FTP Site


Subscriptions


Reprints


Contact Us


Sitemap





Privacy Policy  |
			Terms and Conditions  |
			©2017 Charter Financial Publishing Network Inc. All rights reserved. 
















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Edelman Financial Services LLC: Company Profile - Bloomberg




































































  









Feedback






























edelman financial services llc
Private Company









Company Profile
Sector: Financials
Industry: Asset Management
Sub-Industry: Wealth Management
Edelman Financial Services, LLC operates as an investment advisory firm. The Company provides investment management, financial planning, and advisory services. Edelman Financial Services serves customers in the United States.




Corporate Information
Address:

4000 Legato Road
9th Floor
Fairfax, VA 22033-4055
United States


Phone:
1-888-7526-742


Fax:
-


Web url:
www.edelmanfinancial.com





Board Members




Chairman
Company


Fredric Edelman
Edelman Financial Center LLC








Board Members
Company




Allen Thorpe
Hellman & Friedman LLC


Adam Durrett
Hellman & Friedman LLC


























From The Web











Key Executives


Fredric Mark Edelman "Ric"


Chairman




Ryan Christopher Parker


Chief Executive Officer




Edward Philip Moore "Ed"


President




Rene Emile Chaze


CFO/COO




Christine Adele Cataldo


Chief Information Officer




James Daniel Mendelsohn


Chief Marketing Officer




William Patrick Hayes


General Counsel







Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data

























































































 © 2017 RetirementPlanning.Net  All Rights Reserved | Terms of Use | Privacy Policy




Compare Top Financial Advisors in Your Area 









Pre-screened Financial Advisors - No Obligation - Free Service









Select Your Portfolio Size *Select Portfolio SizeLess than $50,000$50,000 - $100,000$100,000 - $250,000$250,000 - $500,000$500,000 - $1 million$1 million - $3 millionMore Than $3 million


Zip Code *


Name *


Phone Number *


Email *





Search Now! >>




Retirementplanning.net is a helpful online resource for consumers who are trying to be diligent in attending to the details of their long term financial planning. This site exists to provide consumers with informative articles on various topics under the broad category of retirement planning, and also gives users the opportunity to get in touch with top rated retirement planners in their home locality.








Susan, a Retired School Teacher from New York








Compare Local Advisors



Experience


Past Results


Fee Schedules


Investment Style


Professionalism 





as featured on



	 















Select The Advisor That is Right For You!




Compare Proposals




Tell Us Your Financial Goals





























Fix the following errors:Hide




































	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started












































	Experts in Financial Planning. Edelman Financial Services








































































            Call
        

            (888) PLAN-RIC
        


TALK WITH AN ADVISOR
TRY OUR GPS





















Because Money Doesn’t Come With Instructions
Sure, dealing with your finances can be intimidating. That's why we take the time to listen to you, learn your goals and then create your plan using Ric Edelman’s philosophies that reflect the latest academic research.

LEARN MORE ABOUT OUR SERVICES



Sure, dealing with your finances can be intimidating. That's why we take the time to listen to you, learn your goals and then create your plan using Ric Edelman’s philosophies that reflect the latest academic research.


LEARN MORE ABOUT OUR SERVICES



Talk with an Edelman Financial Planner. No cost, no obligation.



First Name

*Required


Last Name

*Required


Email

*Required
Please enter a valid email




Phone Number

*Required


ZIP Code

*Required
Not a valid ZIP











Financial Planning for Your Life




                        Retirement & Estate Planning
                        

                                Make sure your retirement is everything you want it to be - while protecting your family.
                            
READ MORE






                        Taxes, Finances, Credit & Debt
                        

                                Expert tips on taxes, credit and debt.
                            
READ MORE






                        Insurance
                        

                                Learn the truth about insurance and its role in your financial plan.
                            
READ MORE






                        Home Ownership & Mortgages
                        

                                Advice on buying & selling, and choosing the right mortgage for you.
                            
READ MORE






                        Financial Planning & Investments
                        

                                Building the financial plan and investment strategy you need based on your goals.
                            
READ MORE






                        Life Events
                        

                                Financial planning is all about helping you manage the many changes you experience in life.
                            
READ MORE















                                    Register for Our Seminar: Preparing for Retirement
                                


                                        Are you financially ready for retirement? Attend our latest seminar and learn about retirement accounts, Social Security & estate planning.
                                    














                                    Ric's New Book: The Truth About Your Future
                                


                                        Learn how exponential technologies will alter virtually every aspect of your life – including your finances.
                                    














                                    Listen to This Week’s Podcast
                                


                                        Why You Should Consider Adding ETFs to Your Portfolio, How to Save 25% of Your Income, and more.
                                    














                                    How Can a Mortgage Help You in Retirement?
                                


                                        You love owning your home, but hate your mortgage and are trying to get rid of it fast. Our webinar explains why that thinking is dead wrong.
                                    














                                    Buying vs. Leasing Your Next Car 
                                


                                        Get solid advice and questions to ask yourself to help you decide which is right for you.
                                    














                                    How to Choose a Financial Advisor
                                


                                        18 questions to ask prospective advisors — and three things to ponder before you do.
                                    














                                    Get Answers to All Your Financial Questions
                                


                                        Edelman Financial provides a Free Financial Plan to nurses across the country – learn more.
                                    














                                    Try Ric’s GPS – It’s Fast, Fun and Free!
                                


                                        Answer a few simple questions and we’ll show you the portfolio that’s right for you.
                                    














                                    IRA or 401(k)? The Answer May Surprise You
                                


                                        Did you answer that question years ago and not think about it again? Get a fresh perspective and make sure you made the right choice.
                                    


















                You Plan Your Weekends, What About Your Financial Future?
            


We spend our days creating professional financial plans for our clients. You spend your days being you. Together we can create a custom plan with your specific goals and dreams in mind.
Not sure you're ready to get started? Find out more about the Edelman Financial planning process and how we work with you.
LEARN MORE ABOUT FINANCIAL PLANNING






































































